Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB624.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 509. Food processing residuals.(a) A person may not:(1) apply to or spread on any land in this Commonwealth:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 (i) food processing residuals generated from a municipal, commercial or industrial wastewater treatment plant;(ii) compost material that included in its production food processing residuals generated from a municipal, commercial or industrial wastewater treatment plant or septage; or(iii) a ny other product or material that is intended for use as a fertilizer, soil amendment, topsoil replacement or mulch or for other similar agricultural purpose that is derived from or contains food processing residuals generated from a municipal, commercial or industrial wastewater treatment plant or septage; or(2) sell or distribute in this Commonwealth:(i) compost material that included in its production food processing residuals generated from a municipal, commercial or industrial wastewater treatment plant or septage; or(ii) any other product or material that is intended for use as a fertilizer, soil amendment, topsoil replacement or mulch or for other similar agricultural purpose that is derived from or contains food processing residuals generated from a municipal, commercial or industrial wastewater treatment plant or septage.(b) The prohibition under subsection (a) shall not apply to:(1) The disposal or placement at a solid waste landfill of any of the materials that are prohibited from application, spreading, sale or distribution by this section.(2) The land application of or the sale or distribution of compost material or other agricultural product or material 20250SB0624PN0617 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 derived from or containing food processing residuals generated as a result of the processing or cultivation of food, food waste, crops or vegetative material, the brewing of malt liquor, the fermenting of wine or hard cider or the distilling of spirits, including, but not limited to, blueberries, apples, grapes, potatoes, seaweed, fish and seafood and spent grain or malt, provided that the food processing residuals are not mixed with sludge from a municipal, commercial or industrial wastewater treatment plant, septage, sewage or sanitary wastewater prior to or during land application or the production of the compost material or other agricultural product or material.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Animal processing waste." Residual materials in liquid or solid form generated in the slaughtering of poultry and livestock or in processing and converting fish, seafood, milk, meat or eggs to food products."Food processing residuals." Animal processing waste and vegetative processing waste."Vegetative processing waste." Residual materials in liquid or solid form generated in the processing, converting or manufacturing of fruits, vegetables or crops into marketable food items.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0624PN0617 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526